Massachusetts, session 194th, H1095.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 25 of chapter 118E of the Massachusetts General Laws, as most recently 
appearing, is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following new section:- 
(6)(A) For the purposes of this section the following words shall have the following 
meanings: 
“Cash Surrender Value (CSV)”, shall mean, the amount available in cash upon 
cancellation of an insurance policy before it becomes payable upon death or maturity. 
“Term Life Insurance”, shall mean, insurance that provides coverage for a set period and 
does not accumulate any cash value. These policies are excluded from Medicaid asset 
calculations. 
“Permanent Life Insurance”, shall mean, whole life, universal life, and any other life 
insurance policies that accumulate cash surrender value over time. 

of 2 12  (B) The exemption for life insurance policies with cash surrender value when 
determining Medicaid eligibility shall be $10,000 in face value. This exemption applies to the 
combined face value of all whole life, universal life, and any other permanent life insurance 
policies held by the Medicaid applicant or recipient. 
(C) The face value exemption shall be adjusted for inflation every 5 years based on the 
Consumer Price Index (CPI). Adjustments will be rounded to the nearest $100. 
(D) Term life insurance policies shall continue to be excluded from Medicaid eligibility 
calculations, as they do not accumulate any cash surrender value and are intended purely for 
death benefit protection. 
(E) Every three year, the office of Medicaid shall submit a report to the senate and house 
committees on ways and means evaluating the financial impact of the increased exemption on 
the Medicaid program, including any changes in beneficiary access to life insurance policies and 
funeral costs covered by these policies.